Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-509
Judge; clerk magistrate; oath; filing.

Each county judge and clerk magistrate before assuming the duties of office shall take the oath prescribed by law for district judges. Oaths of county judges shall be filed with the Secretary of State. Oaths of clerk magistrates shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 9;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 4.

Oath or affirmation, judicial officers, see Article XV, section 1, Constitution of Nebraska.